dev/wikt.full-form.pl.dix
    <pardef n="pomarańcz/a__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ę</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ą</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>o</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>/pomarańczy</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>om</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ach</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ami</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sob/ota__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>ota</l><r>ota<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>otę</l><r>ota<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>oty</l><r>ota<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ocie</l><r>ota<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ocie</l><r>ota<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>otą</l><r>ota<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>oto</l><r>ota<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>oty</l><r>ota<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>oty</l><r>ota<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ót</l><r>ota<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>otom</l><r>ota<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>otach</l><r>ota<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>otami</l><r>ota<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>oty</l><r>ota<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kaw/a__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ę</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ie</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ie</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ą</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>o</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>om</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ach</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ami</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kiur__n_mi">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>owi</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ze</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>em</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ze</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ów</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>om</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ach</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ami</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mieszka/nie__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>nie</l><r>nie<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nie</l><r>nie<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nia</l><r>nie<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niu</l><r>nie<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niu</l><r>nie<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niem</l><r>nie<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nie</l><r>nie<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nia</l><r>nie<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nia</l><r>nie<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ń</l><r>nie<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niom</l><r>nie<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niach</l><r>nie<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niami</l><r>nie<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nia</l><r>nie<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="cena"><i>cen</i><par n="kaw/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="dolina"><i>dolin</i><par n="kaw/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="firma"><i>firm</i><par n="kaw/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="gmina"><i>gmin</i><par n="kaw/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="godzina"><i>godzin</i><par n="kaw/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="jarzębina"><i>jarzębin</i><par n="kaw/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kalkulator"><i>kalkulator</i><par n="kiur__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="kawa"><i>kaw</i><par n="kaw/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kiur"><i>kiur</i><par n="kiur__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="komputer"><i>komputer</i><par n="kiur__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="korona"><i>koron</i><par n="kaw/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kosa"><i>kos</i><par n="kaw/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="leszczyna"><i>leszczyn</i><par n="kaw/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="lipa"><i>lip</i><par n="kaw/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="lokomotywa"><i>lokomotyw</i><par n="kaw/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="mieszkanie"><i>mieszka</i><par n="mieszka/nie__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="monitor"><i>monitor</i><par n="kiur__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="pomarańcza"><i>pomarańcz</i><par n="pomarańcz/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="roślina"><i>roślin</i><par n="kaw/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="rzeźba"><i>rzeźb</i><par n="kaw/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sobota"><i>sob</i><par n="sob/ota__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="strona"><i>stron</i><par n="kaw/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="telewizor"><i>telewizor</i><par n="kiur__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="wydma"><i>wydm</i><par n="kaw/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="wyspa"><i>wysp</i><par n="kaw/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="zima"><i>zim</i><par n="kaw/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="śledziona"><i>śledzion</i><par n="kaw/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="śliwa"><i>śliw</i><par n="kaw/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="żaba"><i>żab</i><par n="kaw/a__n_f"/></e>
